South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 24 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 24-3-185.  Before his release from custody, the Department of Corrections shall provide an inmate in writing the process to have his voting rights restored. The department also shall provide the inmate: (1)   a voter registration form with written instructions for returning the form by mail; and (2)   written information regarding registering to vote in person and electronically. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----